Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [609.016] CRIMINAL CASE INFORMATION COLLECTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Collection. new text end new text begin (a) The Department of Corrections and any court associated with a criminal case shall report any of the following information the department or court currently collects or has in its possession as part of its standard operations: new text end new text begin (1) for each jail detainee and criminal defendant: new text end new text begin (i) full name and any known aliases; new text end new text begin (ii) year of birth; new text end new text begin (iii) race and ethnicity; new text end new text begin (iv) sex; new text end new text begin (v) gender; new text end new text begin (vi) case number; new text end new text begin (vii) public defender eligibility status; new text end new text begin (viii) booking date; new text end new text begin (ix) release date; and new text end new text begin (x) all pending cases associated with the defendant and all booking dates and charges for each case; new text end new text begin (2) for each formal charge, including charges resulting in convictions, filed against a defendant: new text end new text begin (i) charge number; new text end new text begin (ii) charge description; new text end new text begin (iii) charge statute; new text end new text begin (iv) charge type; new text end new text begin (v) charge class severity; new text end new text begin (vi) charge disposition; new text end new text begin (vii) method of disposition, including pretrial diversion, plea negotiation, or trial; new text end new text begin (viii) charge disposition date; and new text end new text begin (ix) prosecuting office, agency, or attorney; new text end new text begin (3) for bail or bond pretrial releases: new text end new text begin (i) date of first appearance before the court; new text end new text begin (ii) judge who presided over the defendant's first appearance and set bail; new text end new text begin (iii) pretrial evaluation form or data contained in the form, including but not limited to the pretrial risk assessment score; new text end new text begin (iv) amount of bail, if any, set at first appearance, including whether there was a percentage of the bail that could be paid directly to the court; new text end new text begin (v) other conditions of release, if any, set at first appearance; new text end new text begin (vi) nonmonetary conditions of release; new text end new text begin (vii) monetary bail or bond amount; new text end new text begin (viii) date of pretrial release, if any; new text end new text begin (ix) release type, including release on own recognizance, release with conditions other than exclusively monetary bail or bond, release on monetary bail or bond, release after completed sentence, transfer to prison, transfer to jail in another jurisdiction, or transfer to other federal agencies; new text end new text begin (x) time served credit length; new text end new text begin (xi) bail or bond revocation due to a new offense, a failure to appear, or violation of the terms of bail or bond; and new text end new text begin (xii) if revocation occurred, whether there was also a reinstatement of the bail or bond; new text end new text begin (4) for each criminal case: new text end new text begin (i) whether the defendant failed to appear at any hearings and whether warrants were issued; new text end new text begin (ii) whether the defendant was public defender eligible; and new text end new text begin (iii) outcome of the defendant's case, including but not limited to dismissal, acquittal, guilty plea, and guilty verdict; new text end new text begin (5) for each sentencing: new text end new text begin (i) plea date, if any; new text end new text begin (ii) sentence date; new text end new text begin (iii) charge sentenced to, charge number, charge description, statute, type, and charge class severity; new text end new text begin (iv) sentence type; new text end new text begin (v) sentence length; new text end new text begin (vi) fine and fees and whether they were waived or stayed due to inability to pay; and new text end new text begin (vii) restitution amount ordered, amount collected, and amount paid to victim; and new text end new text begin (6) any other information required by the Sentencing Guidelines Commission. new text end new text begin (b) The Department of Corrections or court collecting or coming into possession of the information required in paragraph (a) shall forward this information to the Sentencing Guidelines Commission in a timely manner under a schedule and format directed by the commission. The commission shall ensure that each official and agency reports the information in a uniform and consistent format. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this subdivision requires the Department of Corrections or court to collect any information the department or court is not otherwise required to collect. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Sentencing Guidelines Commission; clearinghouse; report. new text end new text begin (a) The Sentencing Guidelines Commission shall serve as a clearinghouse and information center for the information collected pursuant to subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (b) The commission shall report annually to the chairs, cochairs, and minority leads of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over public safety and the judiciary. The report must include a summary of the information received pursuant to subdivision 1, as well as an analysis of the impact of pretrial release practices on criminal case outcomes and public safety in the state. At a minimum, the report must include disaggregated data on the relationship between the type of pretrial release and any conditions imposed by the court, including requiring monetary bail or bond, and: new text end new text begin (1) other factors such as the seriousness of the offense; the defendant's prior record; the location of the court handling the case; whether the defendant is eligible for a public defender; and the defendant's age, race, and sex; new text end new text begin (2) rates of pretrial recidivism, including the level of any subsequent charge and number of the statute alleged to have been violated; new text end new text begin (3) the type of disposition of the case such as dismissal, resolution through a plea agreement, or trial; new text end new text begin (4) the length of time between an initial arrest and disposition of the case; and new text end new text begin (5) the sentence announced by the court, including whether the court stayed adjudication or imposition of the sentence, whether the court departed from the presumptive sentence, and whether any sentence imposed was consecutive to another sentence. new text end new text begin (c) The Sentencing Guidelines Commission, in consultation with representatives from all major criminal legal agencies, including but not limited to the Department of Corrections, jail administrators, the state court administrator's office and the judicial branch, public defenders, prosecutors, law enforcement, probation officers, and community nonprofits and individual community members with expertise in data systems and pretrial policy must: new text end new text begin (1) coordinate the sharing of information required to be submitted to the commission pursuant to subdivision 1; new text end new text begin (2) make recommendations to the legislature regarding any statutory or other changes needed to facilitate the sharing of information; and new text end new text begin (3) provide advice and make recommendations to the legislature regarding additional information that should be collected or other analysis that should be performed on that information to improve the understanding of pretrial release practices. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin MINNESOTA SENTENCING GUIDELINES COMMISSION; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Sentencing Guidelines Commission to receive and store criminal case information, analyze and summarize that information, and report to the legislature. new text end